Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.110

State tartan.

The Washington state tartan is hereby designated. The tartan shall have a pattern of colors, called a sett, that is made up of a green background with stripes of blue, white, yellow, red, and black. The secretary of state shall register the tartan with the Scottish Register of Tartans.

[ 2019 c 64 s 2; 1991 c 62 s 1.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: "RCW 1.08.025 directs the code reviser, with the approval of the statute law committee, to prepare legislation for submission to the legislature "concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions" in statutes. This act makes technical, nonsubstantive amendments as follows:

(1) Section 2 of this act updates RCW 1.20.110 to reflect 2008 legislation by the Scottish parliament, creating a new register of tartans.

(2) Sections 3, 17, and 19 of this act merge double amendments created when sections were amended without reference to the amendments made in the same year.

(3) Section 4 of this act amends RCW 13.40.193 to reflect a change in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(4) Section 5 of this act corrects an apparent error in RCW 28B.117.040(1). The reference to "subsection (3)(a) of this section" is incorrect. RCW 28B.117.030(3)(a) was apparently intended.

(5) Sections 6 through 16 of this act amend numerous sections in chapter 29A.92 RCW to replace references to "chapter 113, Laws of 2018" with "this chapter."

(6) Section 18 of this act amends RCW 41.50.033 to remove unnecessary subsection references for a defined term.

(7) Sections 20 through 22 of this act merge double amendments created when sections were amended without cognizance of amendments made in previous years.

(8) Section 23 of this act corrects five references to "emergency volunteer health practitioner" in RCW 70.15.110(1). Reference to "volunteer health practitioner" was apparently intended.

(9) Section 24 of this act corrects an apparent error in RCW 70.305.010 (4) and (5). The reference to RCW 43.216.141 appears erroneous. RCW 43.216.157 was apparently intended.

(10) Section 25 of this act amends RCW 74.13.029 to reflect multiple changes in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(11) Section 26 of this act adds a definition section to chapter 74.14B RCW to clarify that, pursuant to RCW 43.216.906, "department" refers to the department of children, youth, and families, rather than the department of social and health services." [ 2019 c 64 s 1.]